Alaska, session 34, HB269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 28.35.191(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) A person commits the offense of failure to use headlights if the person 05 operates a motor vehicle without the use of motor vehicle headlights 06 (1) between one half-hour after sunset and one half-hour before sunrise 07 during the period when use is not required under (4) or (5) of this section; 08 (2) at any other time when, because of insufficient light or other 09 atmospheric conditions, persons or motor vehicles are not clearly discernible at a 10 distance of 1,000 feet; [OR] 11 (3) on a road that is a designated traffic safety corridor under 12 AS 19.10.075; 13 (4) from 14 (A) September 16 through April 30, inclusive, 15 (i) north of 60 degrees North Latitude; or 01 (ii) at any latitude on a paved portion of the Sterling 02 Highway; 03 (B) October 1 through April 14, inclusive, south of 60 04 degrees North Latitude; or 05 (5) during a lawful operating period allowing the operation of a 06 motor vehicle with studded tires or chains by an emergency order issued under 07 AS 28.35.155. 08 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 09 read: 10 APPLICABILITY. AS 28.35.191(a), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to 11 offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.